Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3716
Volunteer; immunity.

A court appointed special advocate volunteer shall be immune from civil liability to the full extent provided in the federal Volunteer Protection Act of 1997.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 39.